Massachusetts, session 194th, H3332.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 64E of chapter 29 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking, in lines 5 and 6, the words “and employing not
more than 20 persons,”
SECTION 2. Said section 64E of said chapter 29, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting at the end thereof the following subsection:-
(g) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the state treasurer, or
designee, may seek to reduce operating expenses for the plan through private donations or grants,
which may include direct and indirect fundraising.
of 1